Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-32,104
Council; member states; costs; how shared.

Each state participating in the Missouri Basin Natural Resources Council shall pay an equal and proportionate share of money to (1) establish the council, (2) provide for the council's operations and overhead, (3) cover the expense of the member states' participating representatives who are not elected officials or state employees whose expenses are otherwise covered by the states, and (4) carry out the council's purposes.

Laws 1985, LB 705, § 3.